Utah statutes.
41-1a-216.   Renewal of registration.

(1)  The division may receive applications for registration renewal and issue new registration cards at any time prior to the expiration of the registration, subject to the availability of renewal materials.

(2) (a)  The new registration shall retain the same expiration month as recorded on the original registration even if the registration has expired, except as provided in Subsection (3).

(b)  The year of registration expiration shall be changed to reflect the renewed registration period.

(3)  Subsection (2) does not apply if the owner can verify to the satisfaction of the division that the vehicle registration was not renewed prior to its expiration due to the fact that the vehicle was in storage, inoperable, or otherwise out of service.

(4)  If the registration renewal application is an application generated by the division through its automated system, the owner need not surrender the last registration card or duplicate.

